Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-215
Consumer goods or services, defined.

Consumer goods or services means any tangible personal property, merchandise, or services normally used for personal, family, or household purposes and not for resale or for use or consumption in trade or business.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 77.